Illinois, session 104th, HB1816.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Section 6-7 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/6-7 new)7    Sec. 6-7. Board of review; counties with 3,000,000 or more 8inhabitants. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 9beginning with the first vacancy to occur on or after the 10effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 11Assembly, in addition to any other requirements set forth by 12law, each member of the board of review in a county with 133,000,000 or more inhabitants must be an attorney licensed to 14practice law in Illinois. A home rule unit may not regulate its 15board of review in a manner that is inconsistent with this 16Section. This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of 17Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 18concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and functions 19exercised by the State.